District of Columbia statutes.
38-2001.17

Funds not subject to assignment, execution or levy.

None of the money mentioned in this subchapter shall be assignable, either in law or equity, or be subject to execution or levy by attachment, garnishment, or other legal process.

History

Jan. 15, 1920, 41 Stat. 390, ch. 39, § 17
June 11, 1926, 44 Stat. 731, ch. 556, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1217.
1973 Ed., § 31-718.